Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 501.080 is amended to read as follows:
Intoxication is a defense to a criminal charge only if such condition either:
(1) Negates[Negatives] the existence of an element of the offense; or
(2) Is not voluntarily produced and deprives the defendant of substantial capacity either
to appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct or to conform his or her conduct
to the requirements of the law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 8:43 AM Jacketed